heb-verbs.lexc
! א=A ב=b ג=g ד=d ה=h ו=w ז=z ח=x ט=v י=y כ=k ל=l מ=m נ=n ס=s ע=E פ=p צ=c ק=q ר=r ש=j ת=t !
! Binyanim numbers: פעל=1, נפעל=2, הפעיל=3, הופעל=4, פיעל=5, פועל=6, התפעל=7 !
! Tense Numbers: 1 = Past, 2 = Present, 3 = Future

Multichar_Symbols 
	+bld1 +bld2 +bld3 +bld4 +bld5 +bld6 +bld7 !Binyanim
	+Pst +Pres +Fut +inf	+1p +2p +3p !tense
	+Mas +Fem +Sg +Pl		!Gender & number
	@U.PEL.o@	@U.PEL.a@	@U.PEL.e@
	^[ ^]

LEXICON Verbs
		Binyanim;

LEXICON Binyanim
<%+PEL : %+PEL>		Bld1S;

LEXICON Bld1S
^[		Bld1; 

LEXICON Bld1
{lbj}@U.PEL.a@		Mright1;	!wear	!שלם
{Axl}@U.PEL.a@		Mright1;	!eat	!נפא
{npl}@U.PEL.o@		Mright1;	!fall	!חפנ
{ptx}@U.PEL.a@		Mright1;	!open
{jmE}@U.PEL.a@		Mright1;	!listen
{Amr}@U.PEL.a@		Mright1;	!say
{njx}@U.PEL.o@		Mright1;	!bite
{mcA}@U.PEL.a@		Mright1;	!find	!נלא
{pgj}@U.PEL.o@		Mright1;	!meet	

!***********Vowels not fully supported:**************
{yjb}@U.PEL.e@		Mright1;	!sit	!נפוי
{jyr}@U.PEL.a@		Mright1;	!sing	!נעוי
{rAh}@U.PEL.e@		Mright1;	!see	!נליה
!**********************************

LEXICON Mright1
.m%>.{		Tense1;

LEXICON Tense1			!since I am inside the merge, I have to use special one-character marks for tenses
<%+Pst : 1>		Past1;
<%+Pres : 2>	Present1;
<%+Fut : 3>		Future1;

LEXICON Past1
+1P+Mas+Sg:KCaTCaLCti		Close;
+2P+Mas+Sg:KCaTCaLCta		Close;
+3P+Mas+Sg:KCaTCaLC			Close;
+1P+Fem+Sg:KCaTCaLCti		Close;
+2P+Fem+Sg:KCaTCaLCt		Close;
+3P+Fem+Sg:KCaTCLCa			Close;

+1P+Mas+Pl:KCaTCaLCnu		Close;
+2P+Mas+Pl:KCaTCaLCtem		Close;
+3P+Mas+Pl:KCaTCLCu			Close;
+1P+Fem+Pl:KCaTCaLCnu		Close;
+2P+Fem+Pl:KCaTCaLCten		Close;
+3P+Fem+Pl:KCaTCLCu			Close;

LEXICON Present1
+Mas+Sg:KCoTCeLC			Close;
+Fem+Sg:KCoTCeLCet			Close;
+Mas+Pl:KCoTCLCim			Close;
+Fem+Pl:KCoTCLCot			Close;

LEXICON Future1
+1P+Mas+Sg:eKCTCVLC					Mleft1; !+1P+Mas+Sg:eKCTCoLC@U.PEL.o@		Close;
+2P+Mas+Sg:tiKCTCVLC				Mleft1; !+2P+Mas+Sg:tiKCTCoLC@U.PEL.o@		Mleft;
+3P+Mas+Sg:yiKCTCVLC				Mleft1; !+3P+Mas+Sg:yiKCTCoLC@U.PEL.o@		Mleft;
+1P+Fem+Sg:eKCTCVLC					Mleft1; !+1P+Fem+Sg:eKCTCoLC@U.PEL.o@		Mleft;
+2P+Fem+Sg:tiKCTCeLCi				Close;
+3P+Fem+Sg:tiKCTCVLC				Mleft1;! +3P+Fem+Sg:tiKCTCoLC@U.PEL.o@		Mleft;

+1P+Mas+Pl:niKCTCVLC				Mleft1; !+1P+Mas+Pl:niKCTCoLC@U.PEL.o@		Mleft;
+2P+Mas+Pl:tiKCTCeLCu				Close;
+3P+Mas+Pl:yiKCTCeLCu				Close;
+1P+Fem+Pl:niKCTCVLC				Mleft1;! +1P+Fem+Pl:niKCTCoLC@U.PEL.o@		Mleft;
+2P+Fem+Pl:tiKCTCeLCu				Close;
+3P+Fem+Pl:tiKCTCVLCna				Mleft1; !+3P+Fem+Pl:tiKCTCoLCna@U.PEL.o@	Mleft;


LEXICON Mleft1
}.%<m.{				Vs;

LEXICON Vs
a@U.PEL.a@			Close;
o@U.PEL.o@			Close;
e@U.PEL.e@			Close;

LEXICON Close
}^]		#;
